src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2755 N 1
SFX 2755 yść esiynia .
SFX 2756 N 1
SFX 2756 yść esiynie .
SFX 2757 N 1
SFX 2757 yść esiynio .
SFX 2758 N 1
SFX 2758 yść esiyniōm .
SFX 2759 N 1
SFX 2759 yść esiyniu .
SFX 2760 N 1
SFX 2760 yść esiyni .
SFX 2761 N 1
SFX 2761 yść esiyniym .
SFX 2762 N 1
SFX 2762 yść esiyń .
SFX 2763 N 1
SFX 2763 yść esōm .
SFX 2764 N 1
SFX 2764 yść esymy .
SFX 2765 N 1
SFX 2765 yść eślibymy .
SFX 2766 N 1
SFX 2766 yść eślibyście .
SFX 2767 N 1
SFX 2767 yść eśliby .
SFX 2768 N 1
SFX 2768 yść eślichmy .
SFX 2769 N 1
SFX 2769 yść eślimy .
SFX 2770 N 1
SFX 2770 yść eśliście .
SFX 2771 N 1
SFX 2771 yść eśli .
SFX 2772 N 1
SFX 2772 yść osłabych .
SFX 2773 N 1
SFX 2773 yść osłabyś .
SFX 2774 N 1
SFX 2774 yść osłaby .
SFX 2775 N 1
SFX 2775 yść osłach .
SFX 2776 N 1
SFX 2776 yść osła .
SFX 2777 N 1
SFX 2777 yść osłech .
SFX 2778 N 1
SFX 2778 yść osłoby .
SFX 2779 N 1
SFX 2779 yść osło .
SFX 2780 N 1
SFX 2780 yść osłybymy .
SFX 2781 N 1
SFX 2781 yść osłybyście .
SFX 2782 N 1
SFX 2782 yść osłyby .
SFX 2783 N 1
SFX 2783 yść osłychmy .
SFX 2784 N 1
SFX 2784 yść osłymy .
SFX 2785 N 1
SFX 2785 yść osłyście .
SFX 2786 N 1
SFX 2786 yść osły .
SFX 2787 N 1
SFX 2787 yść ōsbych .
SFX 2788 N 1
SFX 2788 yść ōsbyś .
SFX 2789 N 1
SFX 2789 yść ōsby .
SFX 2790 N 1
SFX 2790 yść ōs .
SFX 2791 N 1
SFX 2791 yś esa .
SFX 2792 N 1
SFX 2792 yś esiecie .
SFX 2793 N 1
SFX 2793 yś esiesz .
SFX 2794 N 1
SFX 2794 yś esie .
SFX 2795 N 1
SFX 2795 yś esiōnego .
SFX 2796 N 1
SFX 2796 yś esiōne .
SFX 2797 N 1
SFX 2797 yś esiōno .
SFX 2798 N 1
SFX 2798 yś esiōnōm .
SFX 2799 N 1
SFX 2799 yś esiōnych .
SFX 2800 N 1
SFX 2800 yś esiōnyj .
SFX 2801 N 1
SFX 2801 yś esiōnymi .
SFX 2802 N 1
SFX 2802 yś esiōnymu .
SFX 2803 N 1
SFX 2803 yś esiōnym .
SFX 2804 N 1
SFX 2804 yś esiōny .
SFX 2805 N 1
SFX 2805 yś esiyniach .
SFX 2806 N 1
SFX 2806 yś esiyniami .
SFX 2807 N 1
SFX 2807 yś esiynia .
SFX 2808 N 1
SFX 2808 yś esiynie .
SFX 2809 N 1
SFX 2809 yś esiynio .
SFX 2810 N 1
SFX 2810 yś esiyniōm .
SFX 2811 N 1
SFX 2811 yś esiyniu .
SFX 2812 N 1
SFX 2812 yś esiyni .
SFX 2813 N 1
SFX 2813 yś esiyniym .
SFX 2814 N 1
SFX 2814 yś esiyń .
SFX 2815 N 1
SFX 2815 yś esōm .
SFX 2816 N 1
SFX 2816 yś esymy .
SFX 2817 N 1
SFX 2817 yś eślichmy .
SFX 2818 N 1
SFX 2818 yś eśliście .
SFX 2819 N 1
SFX 2819 yś eśli .
SFX 2820 N 1
SFX 2820 yś osłach .
SFX 2821 N 1
SFX 2821 yś osła .
SFX 2822 N 1
SFX 2822 yś osłech .
SFX 2823 N 1
SFX 2823 yś osło .
SFX 2824 N 1
SFX 2824 yś osłychmy .
SFX 2825 N 1
SFX 2825 yś osłyście .
SFX 2826 N 1
SFX 2826 yś osły .
SFX 2827 N 1
SFX 2827 yś ōs .
SFX 2828 N 1
SFX 2828 zy i .
SFX 2829 N 1
SFX 2829 go żj .
SFX 2830 Y 1
SFX 2830 go żyj .
PFX 2830 Y 1
PFX 2830 0 noj .
SFX 2831 N 1
SFX 2831 zd ździe .
SFX 2832 N 1
SFX 2832 ōb obiach .
SFX 2833 N 1
SFX 2833 ōb obiami .
SFX 2834 N 1
SFX 2834 ōb obiowi .
SFX 2835 N 1
SFX 2835 ōb obiōm .
SFX 2836 N 1
SFX 2836 ōb obiōw .
SFX 2837 N 1
SFX 2837 ōb obiu .
SFX 2838 N 1
SFX 2838 ōb obiym .
SFX 2839 N 1
SFX 2839 i si .
SFX 2840 N 1
SFX 2840 i szego .
SFX 2841 N 1
SFX 2841 i sze .
SFX 2842 N 1
SFX 2842 i szo .
SFX 2843 N 1
SFX 2843 i szōm .
SFX 2844 N 1
SFX 2844 i szych .
SFX 2845 N 1
SFX 2845 i szyj .
SFX 2846 N 1
SFX 2846 i szymi .
SFX 2847 N 1
SFX 2847 i szymu .
SFX 2848 N 1
SFX 2848 i szym .
SFX 2849 N 1
SFX 2849 i szy .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 i si .
PFX 2850 Y 1
PFX 2850 0 noj .
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 i szego .
PFX 2851 Y 1
PFX 2851 0 noj .
SFX 2852 Y 1
SFX 2852 i sze .
PFX 2852 Y 1
PFX 2852 0 noj .
SFX 2853 Y 1
SFX 2853 i szo .
PFX 2853 Y 1
PFX 2853 0 noj .
SFX 2854 Y 1
SFX 2854 i szōm .
PFX 2854 Y 1
PFX 2854 0 noj .
SFX 2855 Y 1
SFX 2855 i szych .
PFX 2855 Y 1
PFX 2855 0 noj .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 i szyj .
PFX 2856 Y 1
PFX 2856 0 noj .
SFX 2857 Y 1
SFX 2857 i szymi .
PFX 2857 Y 1
PFX 2857 0 noj .
SFX 2858 Y 1
SFX 2858 i szymu .
PFX 2858 Y 1
PFX 2858 0 noj .
SFX 2859 Y 1
SFX 2859 i szym .
PFX 2859 Y 1
PFX 2859 0 noj .
SFX 2860 Y 1
SFX 2860 i szy .
PFX 2860 Y 1
PFX 2860 0 noj .
SFX 2861 N 1
SFX 2861 go żyj .
SFX 2862 Y 1
SFX 2862 0 jwiyncyj .
PFX 2862 Y 1
PFX 2862 duż n .
SFX 2863 N 1
SFX 2863 a iyma .
SFX 2864 N 1
SFX 2864 a ōch .
SFX 2865 N 1
SFX 2865 a ōma .
SFX 2866 Y 1
SFX 2866 ścia estōma .
PFX 2866 Y 1
PFX 2866 dwa dwu .
SFX 2867 Y 1
SFX 2867 ścia estu .
PFX 2867 Y 1
PFX 2867 dwa dwu .
SFX 2868 N 1
SFX 2868 ście stōma .
SFX 2869 N 1
SFX 2869 ście stu .
SFX 2870 N 1
SFX 2870 a u .
SFX 2871 N 1
SFX 2871 e ga .
SFX 2872 N 1
SFX 2872 e gu .
SFX 2873 N 1
SFX 2873 e gym .
SFX 2874 N 1
SFX 2874 zec cach .
SFX 2875 N 1
SFX 2875 zec cami .
SFX 2876 N 1
SFX 2876 zec ca .
SFX 2877 N 1
SFX 2877 zec ce .
SFX 2878 N 1
SFX 2878 zec cowi .
SFX 2879 N 1
SFX 2879 zec cōm .
SFX 2880 N 1
SFX 2880 zec cōw .
SFX 2881 N 1
SFX 2881 zec cu .
SFX 2882 N 1
SFX 2882 zec cym .
SFX 2883 N 1
SFX 2883 ko iach .
SFX 2884 N 1
SFX 2884 ko iōm .
SFX 2885 N 1
SFX 2885 ko i .
SFX 2886 N 1
SFX 2886 cko ćmi .
SFX 2887 N 1
SFX 2887 e 0 .
SFX 2888 N 1
SFX 2888 ć ciōma .
SFX 2889 N 1
SFX 2889 ōnt yńciōma .
SFX 2890 N 1
SFX 2890 ōnt yńciu .
SFX 2891 N 1
SFX 2891 ćset ciōmaset .
SFX 2892 N 1
SFX 2892 ćset ciuset .
SFX 2893 N 1
SFX 2893 oć ejōncego .
SFX 2894 N 1
SFX 2894 oć ejōnce .
SFX 2895 N 1
SFX 2895 oć ejōnco .
SFX 2896 N 1
SFX 2896 oć ejōncōm .
SFX 2897 N 1
SFX 2897 oć ejōnc .
SFX 2898 N 1
SFX 2898 oć ejōncych .
SFX 2899 N 1
SFX 2899 oć ejōncyj .
SFX 2900 N 1
SFX 2900 oć ejōncymi .
SFX 2901 N 1
SFX 2901 oć ejōncymu .
SFX 2902 N 1
SFX 2902 oć ejōncym .
SFX 2903 N 1
SFX 2903 oć ejōncy .
SFX 2904 N 1
SFX 2904 od adach .
SFX 2905 N 1
SFX 2905 od adami .
SFX 2906 N 1
SFX 2906 od ada .
SFX 2907 N 1
SFX 2907 od adowi .
SFX 2908 N 1
SFX 2908 od adōm .
SFX 2909 N 1
SFX 2909 od adōw .
SFX 2910 N 1
SFX 2910 od adym .
SFX 2911 N 1
SFX 2911 od ady .
SFX 2912 N 1
SFX 2912 od adzie .
SFX 2913 N 1
SFX 2913 oł ale .
SFX 2914 N 1
SFX 2914 oł ałach .
SFX 2915 N 1
SFX 2915 oł ałami .
SFX 2916 N 1
SFX 2916 oł ałowi .
SFX 2917 N 1
SFX 2917 oł ałōm .
SFX 2918 N 1
SFX 2918 oł ałōw .
SFX 2919 N 1
SFX 2919 oł ału .
SFX 2920 N 1
SFX 2920 oł ałym .
SFX 2921 N 1
SFX 2921 oł ały .
SFX 2922 N 1
SFX 2922 0 wi .
SFX 2923 N 1
SFX 2923 ć ciowi .
SFX 2924 N 1
SFX 2924 ć ciōw .
SFX 2925 N 1
SFX 2925 ziyń niach .
SFX 2926 N 1
SFX 2926 ziyń niami .
SFX 2927 N 1
SFX 2927 ziyń nia .
SFX 2928 N 1
SFX 2928 ziyń niowi .
SFX 2929 N 1
SFX 2929 ziyń niōm .
SFX 2930 N 1
SFX 2930 ziyń niu .
SFX 2931 N 1
SFX 2931 ziyń ni .
SFX 2932 Y 1
SFX 2932 ń m .
PFX 2932 Y 1
PFX 2932 dz dn .
SFX 2933 N 1
SFX 2933 zna źnie .
SFX 2934 N 1
SFX 2934 x ksach .
SFX 2935 N 1
SFX 2935 x ksami .
SFX 2936 N 1
SFX 2936 x ksa .
SFX 2937 N 1
SFX 2937 x ksie .
SFX 2938 N 1
SFX 2938 x ksowi .
SFX 2939 N 1
SFX 2939 x ksōm .
SFX 2940 N 1
SFX 2940 x ksōw .
SFX 2941 N 1
SFX 2941 x ksym .
SFX 2942 N 1
SFX 2942 x ksy .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 0 go .
PFX 2943 Y 1
PFX 2943 ft k .
PFX 2944 N 1
PFX 2944 fto kim .
PFX 2945 N 1
PFX 2945 ft kog .
PFX 2946 N 1
PFX 2946 fto kōmu .
SFX 2947 N 1
SFX 2947 ōńź yńziach .
SFX 2948 N 1
SFX 2948 ōńź yńziami .
SFX 2949 N 1
SFX 2949 ōńź yńziōm .
SFX 2950 N 1
SFX 2950 ōńź yńzi .
SFX 2951 N 1
SFX 2951 iec cy .
SFX 2952 N 1
SFX 2952 ki si .
SFX 2953 N 1
SFX 2953 ki szego .
SFX 2954 N 1
SFX 2954 ki sze .
SFX 2955 N 1
SFX 2955 ki szo .
SFX 2956 N 1
SFX 2956 ki szōm .
SFX 2957 N 1
SFX 2957 ki szych .
SFX 2958 N 1
SFX 2958 ki szyj .
SFX 2959 N 1
SFX 2959 ki szymi .
SFX 2960 N 1
SFX 2960 ki szymu .
SFX 2961 N 1
SFX 2961 ki szym .
SFX 2962 N 1
SFX 2962 ki szy .
SFX 2963 Y 1
SFX 2963 ki si .
PFX 2963 Y 1
PFX 2963 0 noj .
SFX 2964 Y 1
SFX 2964 ki szego .
PFX 2964 Y 1
PFX 2964 0 noj .
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 ki sze .
PFX 2965 Y 1
PFX 2965 0 noj .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 ki szo .
PFX 2966 Y 1
PFX 2966 0 noj .
SFX 2967 Y 1
SFX 2967 ki szōm .
PFX 2967 Y 1
PFX 2967 0 noj .
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 ki szych .
PFX 2968 Y 1
PFX 2968 0 noj .
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 ki szyj .
PFX 2969 Y 1
PFX 2969 0 noj .
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 ki szymi .
PFX 2970 Y 1
PFX 2970 0 noj .
SFX 2971 Y 1
SFX 2971 ki szymu .
PFX 2971 Y 1
PFX 2971 0 noj .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 ki szym .
