src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
Firefox/2934,2935,2936,2937,2938,2939,2940,2941,2942
drogo/2829,2830
drōb/2832,2833,872,2834,2835,2836,2837,2838
dugo/2861,2830
dużo/2862
dwa/127,2863,2864,2865,104
dwadziścia/2866,2867
dwoje/2871,2872,2873
dworzec/2874,2875,2876,2877,2878,2879,2880,2881,2882
dziecko/2883,2884,2885,99,100,101,2886
dziewiyńć/2888,556
dziyń/2925,2926,2927,2928,2929,2930,2931,2932
fto/2943
ftoś/2944,2945,2946
gałōńź/2947,2948,2949,2950
gizd/1,2,3,5,6,7,8,9,2831
grabie/430,431,434,2887
gwizd/1,2,5,6,7,10,8,9,2831
jutrzyjszy/2828,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
kroć/1882,1883,1884,1885,1886,1887,1888,1889,2893,2894,2895,2896,2897,2898,2899,2900,2901,2902,2903,1890,1891,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,793,794,795,796,797,25,26,798,799,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,1892,1893,803,804,805,806,807,808,809,1894,810,811,1895,1896,1897,1898,1899,1900,1901,812
lato/92,93,99,2922,96,101,3515,3516
leki/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,2839,2840,2841,2842,2843,2844,2845,2846,2847,2848,2849,2850,2851,2852,2853,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860
marzec/2874,2875,2876,2877,2878,2879,2880,2881,2882
miynki/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,2839,2840,2841,2842,2843,2844,2845,2846,2847,2848,2849,2850,2851,2852,2853,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860
myndrzec/2874,2875,2876,2878,2879,2880,2881,2882,3884
niyrod/2906,4237,4238,4239,2908,4240,4241,4242,4243,2910,4244
nula/4284,2870,105,4285
piytnoście/2868,2869
piyńć/2888,556
piyńćset/2891,2892
powyższy/2828,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
przikłod/2904,2905,2907,2908,2909,3345,2910,2911,2912
rozkłod/2904,2905,2907,2908,2909,3345,2910,2911,2912
rozniyyś/2791,2792,2793,2794,2795,2796,2797,2798,2799,2800,2801,2802,2803,2804,2805,2806,2807,2808,2809,2810,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818,2819,2820,2821,2822,2823,2824,2825,2826,2827,1412,1013
rozniyś/2791,2792,2793,2794,2795,2796,2797,2798,2799,2800,2801,2802,2803,2804,2805,2806,2807,2808,2809,2810,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818,2819,2820,2821,2822,2823,2824,2825,2826,2827,1412,1013
rozniyść/2739,2740,2741,2742,2743,2744,2745,2746,2747,2748,2749,2750,2751,2752,2753,2754,2755,2756,2757,2758,2759,2760,2761,2762,2763,2764,2765,2766,2767,2768,2769,2770,2771,2772,2773,2774,2775,2776,2777,2778,2779,2780,2781,2782,2783,2784,2785,2786,2787,2788,2789,2790,279,395,288
rzodki/2963,2964,2965,2966,2967,2968,2969,2970,2971,2972,2973,81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,2952,2953,2954,2955,2956,2957,2958,2959,2960,2961,2962
siedymdziesiōnt/2889,2890
sioć/1882,1883,1884,1885,1886,1887,1888,1889,2893,2894,2895,2896,2897,2898,2899,2900,2901,2902,2903,1890,1891,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,793,794,795,796,797,25,26,798,799,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,1892,1893,803,804,805,806,807,808,809,1894,810,811,1895,1896,1897,1898,1899,1900,1901,812
sygnoł/2913,2914,2915,2916,2917,2918,2919,2920,2921
szejśćset/2891,2892
sztyrysta/2865,2870
słabizna/83,86,103,104,105,106,2933
sōmsiod/2904,2905,2906,2907,2908,2909,2910,2911,4337
trzinoście/2868,2869
tydziyń/2925,2926,2927,3104,2928,2929,2930,2931,3105
tyngo/2830,2861
wdowiec/897,898,899,900,901,902,903,904,905,2951
wesele/430,431,432,433,434,2444,435,2887,436
wykłod/2904,2905,2907,2908,2909,3345,2910,2911,2912
ziyńć/111,112,554,279,2923,113,2924,556,114,557
zniyś/2791,2792,2793,2794,2795,2796,2797,2798,2799,2800,2801,2802,2803,2804,2805,2806,2807,2808,2809,2810,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818,2819,2820,2821,2822,2823,2824,2825,2826,2827,1412,1013
ôba/83,86,127,2863,103,2864,2865,104,105,106
ôbadwa/2864,2865,104
ôbiod/2904,2905,2907,2908,2909,3345,2910,2911,4337
ôbniyś/2791,2792,2793,2794,2795,2796,2797,2798,2799,2800,2801,2802,2803,2804,2805,2806,2807,2808,2809,2810,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818,2819,2820,2821,2822,2823,2824,2825,2826,2827,1412,1013
ôbniyść/2739,2740,2741,2742,2743,2744,2745,2746,2747,2748,2749,2750,2751,2752,2753,2754,2755,2756,2757,2758,2759,2760,2761,2762,2763,2764,2765,2766,2767,2768,2769,2770,2771,2772,2773,2774,2775,2776,2777,2778,2779,2780,2781,2782,2783,2784,2785,2786,2787,2788,2789,2790,279,395,288
ôziymdziesiōnt/2889,2890
